Florida, session 2026, HB1449.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section
408.7057, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
408.7057 Statewide provider and health plan claim dispute
resolution program.—
(2)
(b) The resolution organization shall review claim
disputes filed by contracted and noncontracted providers and
health plans unless the disputed claim:
1. Is related to interest payment;
2. Does not meet the jurisdictional amounts or the methods
of aggregation established by agency rule, as provided in
paragraph (a);
3. Is part of an internal grievance in a Medicare managed
care organization or a reconsideration appeal through the
Medicare appeals process;
4. Is related to a health plan that is not regulated by
the state;
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1449-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1449 2026
5. Is part of a Medicaid fair hearing pursued under 42
C.F.R. ss. 431.220 et seq.;
6. Is the basis for an action pending in state or federal
court; or
7. Is subject to a binding claim-dispute-resolution
process provided by contract entered into prior to October 1,
2000, between the provider and the managed care organization;
8. Is related to services initiated pursuant to s.
395.1041 or 42 U.S.C. s. 1395dd and has been submitted and meets
the criteria for resolution through the federal independent
dispute resolution process; or
9. Is related to services rendered by out-of-network
providers and has been submitted and meets the criteria for
resolution through the federal independent dispute resolution
process.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1449-01-c1